test/src/morphology/N-kniga_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - книга M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      книга+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: кни́га
      книга+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: кни́гу
      книга+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: кни́ги
      книга+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: кни́ге
      книга+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: кни́ге
      книга+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: кни́гой
      книга+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: кни́ги
      книга+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: кни́ги
      книга+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: кни́г
      книга+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: кни́гах
      книга+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: кни́гам
      книга+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: кни́гами
